Illinois, session 104th, SB1607.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Freedom Trails Commission Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Commission" means the Illinois Freedom Trails Commission.8    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources. 9    Section 10. Establishment of Commission. 10    (a) The Illinois Freedom Trails Commission is established. 11The purposes of the Commission are to explore, research, and 12commemorate the journeys of freedom seekers and the sites and 13landmarks in this State that became the networks of the 14Underground Railroad. 15    (b) The Commission shall consist of a chairperson and 10 16additional members appointed by the Governor. The membership 17may include, but is not limited to, persons who are public 18officials, scholars, and community-based activists who have 19knowledge and interest in promoting the work of the 20Commission. Members shall be broadly representative of the 21State and the variety of groups interested in promoting the 22work of the Commission.   SB1607 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09512 SPS 19575 b1    (c) The terms of the members shall be 4 years. Members 2shall serve until their successors are appointed and 3qualified. Any vacancy in the membership of the Commission 4shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term. 5Members shall serve without compensation, but may be 6reimbursed for reasonable expenses. 7    (d) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall provide 8administrative and other support to the Commission.9    (e) Subject to appropriation, the Commission shall hire a 10full-time professional staff to implement Commission projects.11    (f) At its first meeting and annually thereafter, the 12Commission shall elect from among its members a chairperson 13and other officers it considers necessary or appropriate. 14After its first meeting, the Commission shall meet at the call 15of the chairperson or if requested by 7 or more members.16    (g) A majority of the members of the Commission constitute 17a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of the 18Commission. A majority of the members present and serving is 19required for official action of the Commission.20    (h) All business that the Commission is authorized to 21perform shall be conducted at a public meeting of the 22Commission, held in compliance with the Open Meetings Act.23    (i) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, 24or retained by the Commission in the performance of an 25official function is subject to the Freedom of Information 26Act.   SB1607 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09512 SPS 19575 b1    Section 15. Duties of Commission. The Commission shall 2have the following duties: 3        (1) to provide resources for individuals and local 4    entities seeking to learn more about the Underground 5    Railroad in Illinois, including: 6            (A) an online resource website, including, but not 7        limited to maps of journeys, historical sites, and 8        conductor cemetery markers; 9            (B) a calendar of related events in this State; 10            (C) research sources and bibliographies; 11            (D) videos and links to videos; and 12            (E) pictures, brief histories, and other materials 13        developed locally and at the State level; 14        (2) collaborate with organizations focusing on the 15    Underground Railroad, including: 16            (A) local and regional Underground Railroad 17        groups; 18            (B) county and regional historical societies; 19            (C) museums, especially museums that focus on 20        slavery and the African American experience; 21            (D) academic programs, especially African American 22        Studies at the college level and history departments; 23        and 24            (E) organizations in African American communities; 25        (3) to create a grant funding program;   SB1607 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09512 SPS 19575 b1        (4) to work with the National Park Service's Network 2    to Freedom program and serve as a liaison between the 3    National Park Service and local entities;4        (5) to explore heritage tourism opportunities 5    connecting the locations of freedom seeker journeys and 6    Underground Railroad sites, working with the Illinois 7    Office of Tourism and regional tourism agencies; and 8        (6) to connect freedom seekers and Underground 9    Railroad stories to the range of freedom stories across 10    and throughout the history of Illinois. 11    Section 20. Online database and educational programs. 12    (a) The Commission shall create a publicly available 13website that includes educational material concerning freedom 14seekers' journeys on the portions of the Underground Railroad 15in this State, including: 16        (1) an updated database of freedom seekers and their 17    journeys to and through Illinois; 18        (2) an updated map of the geography of the Underground 19    Railroad in Illinois; and 20        (3) a biographical dictionary of key persons 21    identified with the Underground Railroad in Illinois, 22    including freedom seekers, abolitionist allies, and 23    pro-slavery antagonists. 24    (b) The Commission, in collaboration with the State Board 25of Education, shall develop and implement an educational   SB1607 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09512 SPS 19575 b1program to be made available to every public school in this 2State. The educational program shall include instruction on: 3        (1) events of African American history, including the 4    African slave trade, slavery in the United States, and the 5    vestiges of slavery in this country; 6        (2) the journeys of freedom seekers and the 7    Underground Railroad in Illinois; and8        (3) additional resources and activities to be used in 9    February as part of Black History Month. 10    (c) The Commission shall identify scholars in higher 11education and community-based organizations to engage in 12research and to be recruited into a speakers' bureau on the 13Underground Railroad and anti-slavery activity in Illinois. 14    (d) The Commission shall support and publicize local 15activities in this State that focus on the Underground 16Railroad, including offering exhibits at meetings of 17organizations open to spreading knowledge about abolitionism 18and the Underground Railroad. The Commission shall focus on 19supporting organizations in African American communities, 20including assisting members of those communities undertake 21research related to the history of their communities. 22    Section 25. Historic site and landmark recognition and 23preservation. 24    (a) The Commission shall develop statewide guidelines for 25the evaluation of freedom seeker journeys and Underground   SB1607 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09512 SPS 19575 b1Railroad sites and landmarks in the State. The Commission 2shall use the guidelines to determine and maintain a list of 3freedom seeker journeys and Underground Railroad sites and 4landmarks and make the list available to the public. The 5Commission shall include a contact person who represents the 6site or landmark for each site or landmark included on the 7list. 8    (b) The Commission shall develop standards and guidelines 9for historic markers, signage, and other commemorative tools 10and activities for sites and landmarks listed under subsection 11(a). The Commission shall also assist sites and landmarks 12listed under subsection (a) that are threatened with 13demolition or deterioration. 14    (c) The Commission shall assist individuals and historic 15preservation organizations in assessing freedom seeker 16journeys and Underground Railroad sites and landmarks and 17shall collaborate with the University of Illinois Extension 18Master Gardener program, the Department, and other partners 19concerning opportunities for the development of freedom seeker 20journeys and Underground Railroad sites and landmarks. 21    Section 30. Grant program. Subject to appropriation, the 22Commission may award grants for the following purposes: 23        (1) to research and identify freedom seeker journeys 24    and Underground Railroad sites and landmarks; 25        (2) to develop heritage tourism and promotional   SB1607 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09512 SPS 19575 b1    activities on the Underground Railroad, including 2    exhibits, lectures, symposiums, and online materials; and 3        (3) to support an Underground Railroad cemetery marker 4    program. 5    Section 35. Annual report. The Commission shall submit a 6report to the Governor and the General Assembly by July 1, 72026, and each year thereafter. The report shall include, at a 8minimum, a description of the programs administered by the 9Commission. 10    Section 40. Rulemaking. After consultation with and 11written approval by the Department, the Commission may adopt 12administrative rules as may be necessary to carry out the 13provisions of this Act in accordance with the Illinois 14Administrative Procedure Act. 15    Section 45. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 162037. 17    (20 ILCS 3405/22 rep.)18    Section 90. The Historic Preservation Act is amended by 19repealing Section 22. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.